Massachusetts, session 194th, S2935.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 50 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Political committee” and 
3 inserting in place thereof the following definition:-  
4  ''Political committee'' shall apply only to a committee elected as provided in chapter f52, 
5 except that in chapter 55, “political committee” shall also apply to any committee, association, 
6 organization or other group of persons, including a national, regional, state, county or municipal 
7 committee, which receives contributions or makes expenditures for the purpose of influencing 
8 the nomination or election of a candidate, or candidates, or of presidential and vice presidential 
9 electors or for the purpose of opposing or promoting a charter change, referendum question, 
10 constitutional amendment or other question submitted to the voters.  
11  SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 55 of the General Laws, as amended by section 181 of 
12 chapter 238 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended in the definition of “Contribution” by 
13 inserting at the end thereof the following:-  

2 of 26 14  ; provided, however, that “contribution” shall not include any payments in the aggregate 
15 of less than $7,500 per calendar year made by individuals for food, beverages, or goods sold by a 
16 political party committee organized pursuant to section or 3 of chapter 52 for a nominal price per 
17 item at events such as bake sales, farmer’s markets or community festivals, even if the purchase 
18 price exceeds the cost of the goods sold.  
19  SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
20 amended by inserting after the definition of “independent expenditure” the following definition:-  
21  “In-kind contribution”, anything of value that is provided to a committee or candidate in 
22 a non-monetary form, including, but not limited to: (i) the value of goods or services provided 
23 free of charge; (ii) the difference between the cost charged and the usual market value charged; 
24 or (iii) the amount paid by a person or entity on behalf of the committee or candidate.  
25  SECTION 4. Section 2 of said chapter 55, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
26 hereby amended in paragraph (1) by striking the words “fifty dollars” each time they appear and 
27 inserting in place thereof the following:- $100.  
28  SECTION 5. Said section 2 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
29 amended in paragraph (3) by striking the words “fifty dollars” and inserting in place thereof the 
30 following:- $100.  
31  SECTION 6. Section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended in the 
32 eighth paragraph by striking out the words “The name of a candidate who is required to file 
33 campaign finance reports with the director, and who fails to file any statement or report after the 
34 initiation of civil proceedings under this section to compel the filing, shall not be printed on any 
35 municipal preliminary, state primary or general or special election ballot unless the statement or 

3 of 26 36 report is timely filed pursuant to chapter 53 or any charter or special law establishing the filing 
37 deadline.” and inserting in place thereof the following:-  
38  The name of a candidate who is required to file campaign finance reports with the 
39 director, and who fails to file any statement or report after the initiation of civil proceedings 
40 under this section to compel the filing, shall not be printed on any municipal preliminary, state 
41 primary or general or special election ballot for a period of 10 years from the due date of the 
42 statement or report not filed or unless the statement or report is timely filed pursuant to chapter 
43 53 or any charter or special law establishing the filing deadline, whichever comes first.  
44  SECTION 7. Said section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
45 amended in the eighth paragraph by striking out the words “Any candidate who is disqualified 
46 from appearing on any municipal preliminary, state primary or general or special election ballot 
47 as set forth above shall be ineligible to be nominated or elected as a write-in or sticker candidate 
48 unless the candidate shall have filed the statements or reports which are the subject of the civil 
49 litigation by the date of the municipal preliminary, state primary or general or special election in 
50 which the candidate is seeking nomination or election.” and inserting in place thereof the 
51 following:-  
52  Any candidate who is disqualified from appearing on any municipal preliminary, state 
53 primary or general or special election ballot as set forth above shall be ineligible to be nominated 
54 or elected as a write-in or sticker candidate for a period of 10 years from the due date of the 
55 statement or report not filed or unless the candidate shall have filed the statements or reports 
56 which are the subject of the civil litigation by the date of the municipal preliminary, state 

4 of 26 57 primary or general or special election in which the candidate is seeking nomination or election, 
58 whichever comes first. 
59  SECTION 8. Said section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
60 amended in the ninth paragraph by inserting after the words “contributions and expenditures.” 
61 the following sentence:-  
62  Any records or documents received or reviewed by the director as part of an audit or 
63 investigation shall not be a public record for the purposes of chapter 66 while in the custody and 
64 possession of the agency.  
65  SECTION 9. Said section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
66 amended in the eleventh paragraph by striking out the first sentence inserting in place thereof the 
67 following sentence:-  
68  The director shall inform any person or committee under investigation by said director by 
69 certified mail, return receipt requested, by personal delivery, by leaving a copy of the notice at 
70 the person's last and usual place of residence, by delivering a copy of the notice to an attorney 
71 who has appeared on behalf of the alleged violator or by service which may be made by a deputy 
72 sheriff or constable either by personal delivery or leaving at the person’s last and usual place of 
73 residence of the director’s intention to present to the attorney general evidence of any alleged 
74 violation of this chapter.  
75  SECTION 10. Said section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
76 amended by adding the following subsection delineations:-  
77  (i) at the beginning of the first paragraph: (a);  

5 of 26 78  (ii) at the beginning of the sixth paragraph: (b);  
79  (iii) at the beginning of the twelfth paragraph: (c);  
80  (iv) at the beginning of the thirteenth paragraph: (d); and  
81  (v) at the beginning of the fourteenth paragraph: (e).  
82  SECTION 11. Said section 3 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
83 amended by adding the following new subsection:-  
84  (f) The director may resolve any matter concerning violation of this chapter through the 
85 following disposition method:  
86  (1) If the director determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that any candidate, 
87 committee or other person or entity has failed to file a statement or report as required by law, or 
88 if it appears to the director that any such statement or report filed with the director does not 
89 conform to law, the director may order such candidate, committee or other person or entity to file 
90 such statement or report or to amend such statement or report so that it conforms to the law, and 
91 may take such other action, including the imposition of an administrative fine, an order to 
92 disgorge a contribution received that does not conform to the law or a contribution received in a 
93 manner that does not conform to the law or any other such relief as in the director’s judgment 
94 may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Any administrative fine imposed 
95 pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the penalties set forth in the applicable section or 
96 sections of chapter 5, and any fine collected shall be deposited in the Local Election Voting Fund 
97 established by section 42 of chapter 10.  

6 of 26 98  (2) No order under this section shall be entered without prior notice of and opportunity 
99 for hearing. Notice shall conform to subsection (b) of section 3.  
100  (3) Any person aggrieved by a final decision of or order issued by the director in an 
101 adjudicatory proceeding hereunder may obtain judicial review pursuant to section 14 of chapter 
102 30A.  
103  SECTION 12. Section 5 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
104 striking out, in line 10, the word “address” and inserting in place thereof the following:- business 
105 address.  
106  SECTION 13. Said section 5 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
107 amended by striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the phrase “the name and residential address” and 
108 inserting in place thereof the following:- the name and business or residential address.  
109  SECTION 14. Said section 5 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
110 amended by striking out, in line 19, the phrase “residential address” and inserting in place 
111 thereof the following:- business or residential address.  
112  SECTION 15. Said section 5 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
113 amended by striking out, in line 21, the phrase “name and address” and inserting in place thereof 
114 the following:- name and business or residential address.  
115  SECTION 16. Said section 5 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
116 amended by striking out, in line 62, the word “addresses” and inserting in place thereof the 
117 following:- business or residential addresses.  

7 of 26 118  SECTON 17. Section 6 of said chapter 55, as amended by section 182 of chapter 238 of 
119 the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in 
120 place thereof the following paragraph:-  
121  A political committee, duly organized, may receive, pay or expend money or other things 
122 of value for the enhancement of the political future of the candidate or the principle for which the 
123 committee was organized; provided, however, that the expenditure shall not be primarily for the 
124 candidate’s or any other person’s personal use. The director shall establish reasonable rules and 
125 regulations concerning the expenditures.  
126  SECTION 18. Said section 6 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
127 amended by striking from the second paragraph the words “$100 in any 1 calendar year” and 
128 inserting in place thereof the following:- $500 in any 1 calendar year; provided, however, that 
129 such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed 
130 $1,000 in any such cycle.  
131  SECTION 19. Said section 6 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
132 amended by striking the fourth paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the 
133 following paragraph:-  
134  Except as otherwise provided in section 6B, a political committee not organized on behalf 
135 of an individual candidate may contribute to another political committee not organized on behalf 
136 of an individual candidate; provided, however, that the aggregate of contributions to elected 
137 political committees or non-elected political committees organized on behalf of a political party 
138 pursuant to section 1 of chapter 52 shall not exceed in any 1 calendar year the sum of $15,000; 
139 provided further, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall 

8 of 26 140 not, in any case, exceed $30,000 in any such cycle; provided further, that the aggregate of such 
141 campaign contributions to any one such political committee established pursuant to section 2 or 3 
142 of chapter 52 shall not exceed in any 1 calendar year the sum of $1,500; provided further, that 
143 such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed 
144 $3,000 in any such cycle; provided further, that the aggregate of contributions to a political 
145 committee other than a political party committee shall not exceed in any 1 calendar year the sum 
146 of $1,500; and provided further, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election 
147 cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $3,000 in any such cycle. A political committee not 
148 organized on behalf of an individual candidate, other than a political party committee, may 
149 contribute to the campaign fund of a candidate; provided, however, that the aggregate of all such 
150 contributions for the benefit of any 1 candidate and such candidate's committee shall not exceed 
151 the sum of $1,500 in any 1 calendar year; and provided further, that such expenditures may be 
152 aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $3,000 in any such cycle. 
153 The political committee of a political party may contribute to the campaign fund of a candidate; 
154 provided, however, that the aggregate of all contributions of money for the benefit of any 1 
155 candidate and the non-elected political committee organized on such candidate's behalf shall not 
156 exceed in any 1 calendar year the sum of $7,500 in the case of the state committee and the sum 
157 of $1,500 in the case of each town or ward committee; a provided further, that such expenditures 
158 may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $15,000 in any 
159 such cycle in the case of the state committee and the sum of $3,000 in the case of each town or 
160 ward committee. For the purposes of the limitations established by this section, all campaign 
161 contributions made by political committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by 
162 any person, including any parent committee of a subsidiary committee or any person other than a 

9 of 26 163 natural person, shall be considered to have been made by a single political committee. Nothing in 
164 this section shall be construed to permit contributions to political committees which are 
165 otherwise prohibited by this chapter.  
166  SECTION 20. Section 6A of said chapter 55 is hereby repealed.  
167  SECTION 21. Said chapter 55 is hereby amended by striking section 7 in its entirety and 
168 inserting in its place the following section:-  
169  Section 7. Receipts, disbursements and contributions regulated; limitations; penalties  
170  No person or combination of persons, including a corporation formed under the 
171 provisions of chapter 180, shall in connection with any nomination or election receive money or 
172 its equivalent, expend or disburse or promise to expend or disburse the same, except as 
173 authorized by this chapter. A political committee or a person acting under the authority or on 
174 behalf of such a committee may receive money or its equivalent, or expend or disburse or 
175 promise to expend or disburse the same for the purpose of aiding or promoting the success or 
176 defeat of a candidate at a primary or election or a political party or principle in public election or 
177 favoring or opposing the adoption or rejection of a question submitted to the voters and for other 
178 purposes expressly authorized by this chapter subject, however, to the provisions thereof. A 
179 candidate may make expenditures without limitation for the purposes of the candidate’s own 
180 campaign and may make campaign contributions without limitation for the benefit of the non 
181 elected political committee organized on the candidate’s behalf.  
182  No candidate or candidate's committee shall receive a transfer of funds or assets from any 
183 federal political committee.  

10 of 26 184  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and section seven A, an individual of less 
185 than eighteen years of age shall not make campaign contributions in an amount in excess of 
186 twenty-five dollars in the aggregate during any one calendar year.  
187  Violation of any provision of this section or section 7A shall be punished by 
188 imprisonment for not more than 6 months or by a fine of not more than $1,000.  
189  SECTION 22. Subsection (a) of section 7A of said chapter 55, as appearing in the 2022 
190 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking paragraph (1) and inserting in place thereof the 
191 following paragraph:-  
192  (1) An individual may make campaign contributions to candidates or candidates' 
193 committees. The aggregate of all such contributions for the benefit of any 1 candidate and that 
194 candidate's committee shall not exceed the sum of $1,500 in a calendar year; provided, however, 
195 that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, 
196 exceed $3,000 in any such cycle; provided further, that the aggregate of contributions by an 
197 individual for the benefit of any 1 candidate and the candidate's committee seeking election to 
198 the office of state senator or state representative in a state election who previously, in the same 
199 calendar year, sought election to the office of state senator or state representative in a special 
200 election, shall not exceed the sum of $1,500 during the period beginning on the first day of 
201 January and ending on the day of the special election and an additional $1,500 during the period 
202 that begins on the day after the special election and ends on the last day of December following 
203 the special election.  

11 of 26 204  SECTION 23. Said subsection (a) of said section 7A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, 
205 is hereby further amended by striking out paragraph (2) in its entirety and inserting in place 
206 thereof the following: -  
207  An individual may in addition make campaign contributions for the benefit of elected 
208 political committees or non-elected political committees organized on behalf of a political party; 
209 provided, however, that the aggregate of such campaign contributions to any 1 such political 
210 committee established pursuant to section 1 of chapter 52 shall not exceed in any 1 calendar year 
211 the sum of $15,000; provided, however, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year 
212 election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $30,000 in any such cycle; provided further, that 
213 the aggregate of such campaign contributions to any one such political committee established 
214 pursuant to section 2 or 3 of said chapter 52 shall not exceed in any one calendar year the sum of 
215 $1,500; and provided further, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle 
216 but shall not, in any case, exceed $3,000 in any such cycle.  
217  SECTION 24. Said subsection (a) of said section 7A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, 
218 is hereby further amended in paragraph (3) by striking out the words “five hundred dollars” and 
219 inserting in place thereof the following: - $1,500; provided, however, that such expenditures may 
220 be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $3,000 in any such 
221 cycle.  
222  SECTION 25. Said section 7A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
223 striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
224  (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the aggregate of all contributions 
225 by a legislative or executive agent for the benefit of any 1 candidate and such candidate's 

12 of 26 226 committee shall not exceed the sum of $500 in any 1 calendar year; provided, however, that such 
227 expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed 
228 $1,000 in any such cycle. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the aggregate of 
229 all contributions by a legislative or executive agent to any other political committee, other than a 
230 ballot question committee, shall not exceed the sum of $500 in any 1 calendar year; provided, 
231 however, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any 
232 case, exceed $1,000 in any such cycle.  
233  SECTION 26. Said section 7A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
234 amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
235  (c) The aggregate of all contributions by a person who holds a license issued by the 
236 Massachusetts gaming commission, who was required to apply for that license under section 14 
237 of chapter 23K and section 4 of chapter 23N, for the benefit of any 1 candidate and such 
238 candidate's committee shall not exceed $500 in a calendar year; provided, however, that such 
239 expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed 
240 $1,000 in any such cycle. The aggregate of all contributions by a person who holds a license 
241 issued by the Massachusetts gaming commission, who was required to apply for that license 
242 under said section 14 of said chapter 23K and section 4 of chapter 23N, for the benefit of any 
243 other political committee, other than a ballot question committee, shall not exceed $500 in a 
244 calendar year; provided, however, that such expenditures may be aggregated by 2-year election 
245 cycle but shall not, in any case, exceed $1,000 in any such cycle.  
246  SECTION 27. Said chapter 55 is hereby amended by inserting after section 7A the 
247 following section:-  

13 of 26 248  Section 7B. Using the federal consumer price index for the Boston statistical area, the 
249 director shall biennially index for inflation the contribution and aggregate amount limits referred 
250 to in sections 6 and 7A of this chapter. Not later than December 31 of each even numbered year 
251 beginning with 2026, the director shall calculate and publish such indexed limits, rounded up to 
252 the nearest $50; provided, however, that the director shall use the unrounded limits when 
253 indexing the limits for inflation in the subsequent even numbered year.  
254  SECTION 28. Section 8A of said chapter 55 is hereby repealed.  
255  SECTION 29. Section 9 of said chapter 55, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
256 hereby amended by striking from the title of the section the words “$50 or”.  
257  SECTION 30. Said section 9 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is further hereby 
258 amended by striking from the first sentence the words “$50 in cash or $100 in money order or 
259 bank check” and inserting in place thereof the following:- $100 in cash, money order or bank 
260 check.  
261  SECTION 31. Said section 9 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
262 amended in the sixth sentence by striking from out the figures “$50” and inserting in place 
263 thereof the following:- $100.  
264  SECTION 32. Section 10 of chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding 
265 after the word “dollars” the following words:- “, provided further, that all other penalties and 
266 fines assessed shall be payable to the local election voting fund established in section 43 of 
267 chapter 10, no candidate shall be able to disgorge funds associated with said penalty.  

14 of 26 268  SECTION 33. Section 13 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
269 striking out the first sentence in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following 5 
270 sentences:-  
271  No person employed for compensation, other than an elected officer, by the 
272 commonwealth or any county, city or town shall directly or indirectly solicit or receive any gift, 
273 payment, contribution, assessment, subscription or promise of money or other thing of value for 
274 the political campaign purposes of any candidate for public office or of any political committee, 
275 or for any political purpose whatever. This prohibition shall not apply to a member of the 
276 National Guard when not on active duty. This section shall not prevent such persons from being 
277 members of political organizations or committees. A person so employed shall not serve as the 
278 treasurer of a political committee. The soliciting or receiving of any gift, payment, contribution, 
279 assessment, subscription or promise of money or other thing of value by a non-elected political 
280 committee organized to promote the candidacy for public office of a person so employed for 
281 compensation by the commonwealth or any county, city or town, shall not be deemed to be a 
282 direct or indirect solicitation or receipt of such contribution by such person; provided, however, 
283 that no such gift, payment, contribution, assessment, subscription or promise of money or other 
284 thing of value shall be solicited or received on behalf of such a person from any person or 
285 combination of persons if such person so employed knows or reasonably should know that the 
286 person or combination of persons has an interest in any particular matter in which the person so 
287 employed participates or has participated in the course of such employment or which is the 
288 subject of the person’s official responsibility.  
289  SECTION 34. Section 14 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
290 striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-  

15 of 26 291  No person shall in any building or part thereof occupied for state, county or municipal 
292 purposes demand, solicit or receive any payment or gift of money or other thing of value for the 
293 purposes set forth in section 13; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to an 
294 individual, candidate, political committee or a person acting on behalf of such individual, 
295 candidate or political committee, that rents or leases a portion of a building occupied for state, 
296 county or municipal purposes, other than the state house or a city or town hall, for the purpose of 
297 holding a meeting, fundraiser or similar event on the same terms and conditions as offered to a 
298 member of the public; and provided further, that no government business shall be conducted in 
299 that portion of the building during the meeting, fundraiser or event.  
300  SECTION 35. Section 18 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
301 striking out the words “January 20” each time they appear and inserting in place thereof the 
302 words:- “January 31”.  
303  SECTION 36. Subsection (a) of said section 18 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is 
304 hereby amended in paragraph (1) by striking out clause (i) and inserting in place thereof the 
305 following clause:-  
306  (i) the eighth day preceding a city or town preliminary or primary, including a caucus, the 
307 eighth day preceding a city or town election, and if a town election held on or after November 1 
308 or city election, as a final report, January 20 in the following year complete as to December 31 of 
309 the prior year and all other town elections, as a final report, the thirtieth day following said 
310 election;  

16 of 26 311  SECTION 37 Subsection (e) of said section 18 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is 
312 hereby amended in paragraph (2) by striking out the figure “$50” each time it appears and 
313 inserting in place thereof the following:- $100.  
314  SECTION 38: Said subsection (e) of said section 18 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, 
315 is hereby further amended in paragraph (8) by striking out the figure “$50” and inserting in place 
316 thereof the following:- $100.  
317  SECTION 39: Subsection (f) of said section 18 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is 
318 hereby amended by striking out the figure “$50” each time it appears and inserting in place 
319 thereof the following:- $100.  
320  SECTION 40. Section 18A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
321 striking out the phrase “after the tenth day, but more than 24 hours before the date of any 
322 election,” and inserting in place thereof the following:- after the tenth day before the date of the 
323 election and up through the date of the election. 
324  SECTION 41. Said section 18A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended 
325 by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following:-  
326  (d) For the purposes of this section, an ''independent expenditure PAC'' shall be a political 
327 committee or other entity that receives contributions to make independent expenditures. An 
328 independent expenditure PAC shall organize in accordance with section 5 and shall, if organized 
329 with the director, appoint a depository bank in accordance with section 19. An independent 
330 expenditure PAC that organizes and files reports with the director shall file reports in accordance 
331 with the schedule set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of section 19. An independent 

17 of 26 332 expenditure PAC that organizes and files reports with a city or town clerk shall file reports in 
333 accordance with the schedule set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 18.  
334  In addition to any reports required by section 18 or 19 of this chapter, the independent 
335 expenditure PAC shall file reports as required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Such 
336 reports shall be filed with the director if the independent expenditure PAC is organized with the 
337 office of campaign and political finance, or with the city or town clerk if organized with the 
338 clerk. Reports filed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall disclose contributions 
339 received, expenditures made and liabilities incurred during the reporting period. The reporting 
340 period for the first report filed by an independent expenditure PAC pursuant to subsection (a) or 
341 (b) of this section shall commence on the day the independent expenditure PAC was organized 
342 and shall be complete through the date of the latest expenditure disclosed in the report. The 
343 reporting period for the next report shall commence on the date following the last date included 
344 in the previous report filed pursuant to subsections (a) or (b) of this section and shall be complete 
345 through the date of the latest expenditures disclosed in the report. An independent expenditure 
346 PAC shall also file a year-end report by January 31 of each year the independent expenditure 
347 PAC remains in existence and shall file a final report upon dissolution. The reporting period for 
348 the year-end report shall be cumulative for the calendar year, commencing on January 1 and 
349 ending on December 31 of each calendar year. The director shall adopt regulations regarding 
350 independent expenditure PACs.  
351  SECTION 42. Subsection (d) of said section 18A of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is 
352 hereby amended by striking out the words “January 20” and inserting in place thereof the 
353 following:- “January 31”.  

18 of 26 354  SECTION 43. Section 18B of said chapter 55 is hereby repealed. 
355  SECTION 44. Section 18C of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
356 striking paragraph (a) in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:- (a) The director 
357 shall develop an electronic reporting system for the submission, retrieval, storage and public 
358 disclosure of campaign finance reports and financial activity statements required to be filed with 
359 the director. The director shall make all the data filed available on the internet of any person or 
360 entity listed as having made a political contribution to the candidate or political committee filing 
361 the report. The address information suppressed shall remain available on the report maintained in 
362 the director’s office but shall not be available as a public record.  
363  SECTION 45. Subsection (b) of said section 18C of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is 
364 hereby amended by striking out clause (viii). 
365  SECTION 46. Section 18D of said chapter 55 is hereby repealed.  
366  SECTION 47. Subsection (b) of section 18E of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby 
367 amended striking out the figure “$50” and inserting in place thereof the following:- $100.  
368  SECTION 48. Subsection (a) of section 19 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby 
369 amended in the first sentence by striking out the words “the treasurers of people's committees 
370 and political action committees that file with the director other than independent expenditure 
371 PACs” and inserting in place thereof the following:-  
372  the treasurers of people's committees, political action committees and independent 
373 expenditure PACs that file with the director.  

19 of 26 374  SECTION 49. Said section 19 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further 
375 amended by striking out the word “and” in line 47 and inserting after the word “report” in line 48 
376 the following:-  
377  ; (iv) a list of all in-kind contributions of more than $50 received as of the last day of the 
378 preceding month and since the last statement, including an alphabetical list of names and 
379 addresses of each person making such contribution, the date received, the type of in-kind 
380 contribution and the value of the in-kind contribution; and (v) a list of new liabilities incurred as 
381 of the last day of the preceding month, including the name and address of the person to whom 
382 the liability exists, together with a clear statement of purpose for which it was incurred.  
383  SECTION 50. Section 19 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
384 by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
385  (c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all payments for campaign purposes 
386 made by or for the benefit of a candidate or by the treasurer of a political committee which are in 
387 excess of $100 shall be made only from funds on deposit in the depository through checks drawn 
388 on the depository and indicating that the checks are drawn on the campaign account of the 
389 candidate or the political committee involved, or in another form as permitted by this section. All 
390 checks drawn on the campaign account shall be payable to the order of a named payee. The 
391 memo line of the check shall be used by the political committee issuing the check to indicate the 
392 specific purpose of the expenditure. A political action committee or political party committee 
393 making an expenditure to support or oppose a candidate shall identify the candidate on the check.  
394  Notwithstanding the restrictions in the paragraph above, a committee may reimburse 
395 individuals, including the candidate or treasurer, in amounts greater than $100; provided, 

20 of 26 396 however, that the reimbursement amounts shall not be more than $1,000; and provided further, 
397 that the committee complies with the following requirements: (i) reimbursements shall be made 
398 to individuals not later than thirty days after the date of the first reimbursed expenditure; (ii) 
399 reimbursement reports shall be filed within three days of the reimbursement check being issued 
400 to disclose underlying expenditures; (iii) no person who is authorized to make expenditures for a 
401 committee may write a check payable to themself; (iv) detailed records including receipts for 
402 reimbursed expenditures shall be maintained; and (v) if a reimbursement is not made consistent 
403 with this paragraph the expenditure shall be deemed an in-kind contribution or loan by the 
404 individual and subject to all contribution restrictions.  
405  A candidate or treasurer of a political committee required to designate a depository may 
406 make expenditures by wire transfer, electronic fund transfer or other electronic means, credit 
407 card or debit card; provided, however, that a candidate or treasurer making an expenditure shall 
408 ensure that the date, amount and specific purpose of the expenditure is disclosed in accordance 
409 with regulations established by the director; and provided further, that a candidate or a treasurer 
410 of a candidate's committee for nomination or election to the state senate or house of 
411 representatives shall provide such disclosures on the same schedule as set forth in paragraph (3) 
412 of subsection (b).  
413  SECTION 51. Section 19 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
414 striking out the phrase “January 20” wherever it may appear and inserting in place thereof the 
415 phrase “January 31”.  

21 of 26 416  SECTION 52. Section 19 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
417 striking the numbers “$50” wherever they may appear and inserting in its place the following: - 
418 $100.  
419  SECTION 53. Section 22 of chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
420 out in the third paragraph the phrase “(4) the twentieth day of January” and inserting in its place 
421 the phrase “January 31”.  
422  SECTION 54. Section 22 of chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
423 out in the fourth paragraph in its entirety and inserting in its place the following:-  
424  If the question appears on ballots at a city or town election or appears on ballots for use in 
425 a city or town at a state election, such report shall be filed with the city or town clerk as follows: 
426 (1) The eighth day preceding a city or town election, and if a town election held on or after 
427 November 1 or city election, as a final report, January 31 in the following year complete as to 
428 December 31 of the prior year, and all other town elections, as a final report, the thirtieth day 
429 following said election;  
430  SECTION 55. Section 22 of chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by deleting 
431 the third sentence from the fifth paragraph in its entirety.  
432  SECTION 56. Said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after 
433 section 22A the following section:-  
434  Section 22B: Persons or corporations making contributions or expenditures to influence 
435 town warrant articles; filing reports with clerk; penalties.  

22 of 26 436  (a) Terms used in this section shall be construed as follows unless a contrary intention 
437 clearly appears:-  
438  “Article”, subjects to be acted upon at a town meeting as referenced in a warrant.  
439  “Town Meeting”, an annual town meeting or special town meeting called pursuant to 
440 chapter 39, section 9.  
441  “Warrant”, the call of a town meeting pursuant to chapter 39, section 10.  
442  (b) Any person, corporation, association, organization or other group of persons, which 
443 has given, paid, or expended, or promised to give, pay or expend, any money or other thing of 
444 value of $1,000 or more in the aggregate in order to influence or affect an article on a warrant or 
445 the vote on any article at a town meeting, shall file reports on a form as prescribed by the 
446 director. The form shall include the date each expenditure was made or liability incurred; the 
447 purpose of the expenditure or liability; the amount of the expenditure; the full name and address 
448 of the person to whom each expenditure was made or liability incurred; the full name and 
449 address of the person, corporation, association, organization or the members of other group of 
450 persons by whom such expenditure was made or liability incurred; and for each gift, payment or 
451 contribution received to make the expenditure or incur the liability (1) the date of receipt; (2) the 
452 amount; and (3) the full name and address from whom each gift, payment or contribution was 
453 received.  
454  (c) Such reports shall be filed with the town clerk as follows: (i) on the fifth day of each 
455 month for any contributions received or expenditures made in the preceding month through the 
456 last day of the preceding month; (ii) on the fifth day preceding a town meeting complete as to the 

23 of 26 457 seventh day preceding the town meeting; and (iii) as a final report, on the thirtieth day following 
458 a town meeting.  
459  (d) This section shall not prohibit any officer, employee or agent of the commonwealth or 
460 its subdivisions from acting in their official capacity or private capacity relative to an article on a 
461 warrant.  
462  (e) Violation of any provision of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not 
463 more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or both.  
464  SECTION 57. Section 25 of chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
465 out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following: -  
466  The director shall retain all statements and reports filed with the office under the 
467 provisions of this chapter by candidates and their committees until December 31st of the 
468 fifteenth year following the date that the statement or report was filed.  
469  SECTION 58. Section 42 of Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
470 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out “consisting of all revenues received under 
471 section 6C of chapter 62,”  
472  SECTION 59. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official 
473 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 42 the following section:-  
474  Section 43. There shall be established on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund 
475 to be known as the Local Election Voting Fund, consisting of all revenues received under section 
476 6C of chapter 62, and all other monies credited or transferred to the fund from any other fund or 
477 source pursuant to law.  

24 of 26 478  The state treasurer shall deposit the fund in accordance with section 34 of chapter 29 in 
479 such manner as will secure the highest interest rate available consistent with safety of the fund.  
480  The local election voting fund shall be expended by the secretary of the commonwealth 
481 in the form of grants to local communities for payment of costs related to elections, including, 
482 but not limited to, election worker payroll, equipment, voter education, vote-by-mail, early 
483 voting, printing, and postage, incurred by the city or town for primary elections, preliminary 
484 elections, state elections, local elections, special primary elections, special preliminary elections, 
485 special state elections and special local elections. 
486  The amount of each grant shall be calculated by dividing the total number of registered 
487 voters in the municipality as of the first day of February of each year by the total number of 
488 registered voters in the commonwealth as of the first day of February each year and then 
489 multiplying the total funds available in the Fund as of the first day of May each year by the 
490 resulting percentage, provided that no city or town shall receive more than three percent of the 
491 available funds.  
492  The funds may be used by the local election official in the municipality for the costs 
493 permitted herein without further appropriation. The funds shall be disbursed by the thirty-first 
494 day of July each year to be expended during that fiscal year. Any funds received will be deducted 
495 from funds found by the State Auditor to be due pursuant to the community Local Mandate Law, 
496 G.L. c. 29, § 27C.  
497  The secretary of the commonwealth shall promulgate regulations as necessary for the 
498 administration of the local election voting fund.  

25 of 26 499  SECTION 60. Sections 42A, 42B and 42C of said Chapter 10, as appearing, are hereby 
500 repealed.  
501  SECTION 61. Section 6C of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
502 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and inserting in its place 
503 the following:-  
504  Section 6C: Massachusetts Local Election Voting Fund; voluntary contributions  
505  Section 6C. Every individual who files a separate return may voluntarily contribute one 
506 dollar to be paid over to the Local Election Voting Fund, established by section forty-two of 
507 chapter ten. In the case of a joint return, each spouse may voluntarily contribute one dollar to 
508 said fund. A credit in the full amount of any contribution under this section shall be allowed 
509 against the tax imposed by this chapter; provided, that for any such return no such credit shall 
510 exceed the income tax liability for any taxable year.  
511  A contribution made under this section may be made with respect to any taxable year at 
512 the time of filing the return of the tax imposed by this chapter for such taxable year; provided, 
513 however, that the commissioner shall prescribe the manner in which such contribution shall be 
514 made on the face of the return required by section five of chapter sixty-two C.  
515  The provisions of this section shall apply only to residents required to file a return under 
516 this chapter. 
517  For purposes of this section the words ''income tax liability for any taxable year'' shall 
518 mean the amount of tax imposed by this chapter reduced by sum of the credits allowed by clause 
519 (a) of section six.  

26 of 26 520  SECTION 62. Chapter 55C, as appearing, is hereby repealed in its entirety.  
521  SECTION 63. Any funds remaining in the State Election Campaign Fund established 
522 pursuant to Section 42 of Chapter 10 on the effective date of this Act shall be deposited in the 
523 Local Election Voting Fund.